Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,158.08
Mobile nail technology salon; owner liability.

The owner of each mobile nail technology salon shall have full responsibility for ensuring that the salon is operated in compliance with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations and shall be liable for any and all violations occurring in the salon.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 65.